Washington statutes.
RCW 42.60.010

Findings.

The legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) Washington state celebrates the rich cultural heritage and diversity of its residents; and

(2) Freedom of religion and protection from persecution on the basis of religion is one of the founding ideals of the nation.

[ 2018 c 303 s 1.]